New York, session 2025-2026, S8188.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 1202-ll to 2 read as follows: 3 § 1202-ll. Occupancy tax in the town of Rhinebeck. (1) Notwithstanding 4 any other provision of law to the contrary, the town of Rhinebeck, in 5 the county of Dutchess, is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and 6 amend local laws imposing in such town a tax, in addition to any other 7 tax authorized and imposed pursuant to this article, such as the legis- 8 lature has or would have the power and authority to impose upon persons 9 occupying any room for hire in any hotel. For the purposes of this 10 section, the term "hotel" shall mean a building or portion of it which 11 is regularly used and kept open as such for the lodging of guests. The 12 term "hotel" includes an apartment hotel, a motel or a boarding house, 13 whether or not meals are served. The rate of such tax shall not exceed 14 three percent of the per diem rental rate for each room whether such 15 room is rented on a daily or longer basis. 16 (2) Such taxes may be collected and administered by the chief fiscal 17 officer of the town of Rhinebeck by such means and in such manner as 18 other taxes which are now collected and administered by such officer or 19 as otherwise may be provided by such local laws. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13015-03-6 S. 8188--A 2 1 (3) Such local laws may provide that any taxes imposed shall be paid 2 by the person liable therefor to the owner of the room for hire in the 3 tourist home, inn, club, hotel, motel or other similar place of public 4 accommodation occupied or to the person entitled to be paid the rent or 5 charge for the room for hire in the tourist home, inn, club, hotel, 6 motel or other similar place of public accommodation occupied for and on 7 account of the town of Rhinebeck imposing the tax and that such owner or 8 person entitled to be paid the rent or charge shall be liable for the 9 collection and payment of the tax; and that such owner or person enti- 10 tled to be paid the rent or charge shall have the same right in respect 11 to collecting the tax from the person occupying the room for hire in the 12 tourist home, inn, club, hotel, motel or other similar place of public 13 accommodation, or in respect to nonpayment of the tax by the person 14 occupying the room for hire in the tourist home, inn, club, hotel, motel 15 or similar place of public accommodation, as if the taxes were a part of 16 the rent or charge and payable at the same time as the rent or charge; 17 provided, however, that the chief fiscal officer of the town, specified 18 in such local laws, shall be joined as a party in any action or proceed- 19 ing brought to collect the tax by the owner or by the person entitled to 20 be paid the rent or charge. 21 (4) Such local laws may provide for the filing of returns and the 22 payment of the taxes on a monthly basis or on the basis of any longer or 23 shorter period of time. 24 (5) This section shall not authorize the imposition of such tax upon 25 any of the following: 26 a. The state of New York, or any public corporation (including a 27 public corporation created pursuant to agreement or compact with another 28 state or the dominion of Canada), improvement district or other poli- 29 tical subdivision of the state; 30 b. The United States of America, insofar as it is immune from taxa- 31 tion; or 32 c. Any corporation or association, or trust, or community chest, fund 33 or foundation organized and operated exclusively for religious, charita- 34 ble or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to chil- 35 dren or animals, and no part of the net earnings of which inures to the 36 benefit of any private shareholder or individual and no substantial part 37 of the activities of which is carrying on propaganda, or otherwise 38 attempting to influence legislation; provided, however, that nothing in 39 this paragraph shall include an organization operated for the primary 40 purpose of carrying on a trade or business for profit, whether or not 41 all of its profits are payable to one or more organizations described in 42 this paragraph. 43 d. A permanent resident of a hotel or motel. For the purposes of this 44 section, the term "permanent resident" shall mean a natural person occu- 45 pying any room or rooms in a hotel or motel for at least thirty consec- 46 utive days. 47 (6) Any final determination of the amount of any tax payable hereunder 48 shall be reviewable for error, illegality or unconstitutionality or any 49 other reason whatsoever by a proceeding under article seventy-eight of 50 the civil practice law and rules if application therefor is made to the 51 supreme court within thirty days after the giving of notice of such 52 final determination, provided, however, that any such proceeding under 53 article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules shall not be 54 instituted unless: 55 a. The amount of any tax sought to be reviewed, with such interest and 56 penalties thereon as may be provided for by local laws or regulations S. 8188--A 3 1 shall be first deposited and there shall be filed an undertaking, issued 2 by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state and 3 approved by the superintendent of financial services as to solvency and 4 responsibility, in such amount as a justice of the supreme court shall 5 approve to the effect that if such proceeding be dismissed or the tax 6 confirmed the petitioner will pay all costs and charges which may accrue 7 in the prosecution of such proceeding; or 8 b. At the option of the petitioner, such undertaking may be in a sum 9 sufficient to cover the taxes, interests and penalties stated in such 10 determination plus the costs and charges which may accrue against it in 11 the prosecution of the proceeding, in which event the petitioner shall 12 not be required to pay such taxes, interest or penalties as a condition 13 precedent to the application. 14 (7) Where any taxes imposed hereunder shall have been erroneously, 15 illegally or unconstitutionally collected and application for the refund 16 therefor duly made to the proper fiscal officer or officers, and such 17 officer or officers shall have made a determination denying such refund, 18 such determination shall be reviewable by a proceeding under article 19 seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules, provided, however, 20 that such proceeding is instituted within thirty days after the giving 21 of the notice of such denial, that a final determination of tax due was 22 not previously made, and that an undertaking is filed with the proper 23 fiscal officer or officers in such amount and with such sureties as a 24 justice of the supreme court shall approve to the effect that if such 25 proceeding be dismissed or the taxes confirmed, the petitioner will pay 26 all costs and charges which may accrue in the prosecution of such 27 proceeding. 28 (8) Except in the case of a willfully false or fraudulent return with 29 intent to evade the tax, no assessment of additional tax shall be made 30 after the expiration of more than three years from the date of the 31 filing of a return, provided, however, that where no return has been 32 filed as provided by law the tax may be assessed at any time. 33 (9) All revenues resulting from the imposition of the tax under the 34 local laws shall be paid into the treasury of the town of Rhinebeck and 35 shall be credited to and deposited in the general fund of the town. Such 36 revenues may be used for any lawful purpose. 37 (10) Each enactment of such a local law may provide for the imposition 38 of a hotel or motel tax for a period of time no longer than two years 39 from the date of its enactment. Nothing in this section shall prohibit 40 the adoption and enactment of local laws, pursuant to the provisions of 41 this section, upon the expiration of any other local law adopted pursu- 42 ant to this section. 43 (11) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to 44 any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, the remainder of this 45 section and the application of such provision to other persons or 46 circumstances shall not be affected thereby. 47 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 48 deemed repealed December 31, 2029.